Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2144
Funds of district; authorized investments.

The funds of the metropolitan utilities district may be invested at the discretion of the board of directors in the warrants and bonds of the district and the municipalities constituting the district, including the warrants and bonds of the improvement districts thereof. In addition to such securities, the funds also may be invested in any securities that are legal investments for the school funds of this state.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 16, p. 359;

R.S.1913, § 4258;

Laws 1919, c. 33, § 5, p. 111;

C.S.1922, § 3761;

C.S.1929, § 14-1017;

R.S.1943, § 14-1027;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1027;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 44.